Washington, session 2025-2026, SB5717.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 46.20 RCW to read as follows:(1) An applicant for a new driver's license under the age of 26 must pass an online course approved by the department on driver work zone and first responder safety.(2) The department may waive the requirement in subsection (1) of this section if the department finds the online course is not available at the time of application.(3) For the purposes of this section, "new driver's license" means a driver's license issued to a driver who has not previously been issued a driver's license in this state.Sec. 2. RCW 46.20.075 and 2024 c 162 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:(1) An intermediate license authorizes the holder to drive a motor vehicle under the conditions specified in this section. An applicant for an intermediate license must be at least 16 years of age and:(a) Have possessed a valid instruction permit for a period of not less than six months;(b) Have passed a driver licensing examination administered by the department;(c) Have passed a course of driver's education in accordance with the standards established in RCW 46.20.100;(d) Have met the applicable driver work zone and first responder safety course requirement under section 1 of this act;(e) Present certification by his or her parent, guardian, employer, or responsible adult to the department stating (i) that the applicant has had at least 50 hours of driving experience, 10 of which were at night, during which the driver was supervised by a person at least 21 years of age who has had a valid driver's license for at least three years, and (ii) that the applicant has not been issued a notice of traffic infraction or cited for a traffic violation that is pending at the time of the application for the intermediate license;(((e)))(f) Not have been convicted of or found to have committed a traffic violation within the last six months before the application for the intermediate license; and(((f)))(g) Not have been adjudicated for an offense involving the use of alcohol or drugs during the period the applicant held an instruction permit.(2) For the first six months after the issuance of an intermediate license or until the holder reaches 18 years of age, whichever occurs first, the holder of the license may not operate a motor vehicle that is carrying any passengers under the age of 20 who are not members of the holder's immediate family. For the remaining period of the intermediate license, the holder may not operate a motor vehicle that is carrying more than three passengers who are under the age of 20 who are not members of the holder's immediate family.(3) The holder of an intermediate license may not operate a motor vehicle between the hours of 1 a.m. and 5 a.m. except (a) when the holder is accompanied by a licensed driver who is at least 25 years of age, or (b) for school, religious, or employment activities for the holder or a member of the holder's immediate family as defined in this section.(4) The holder of an intermediate license may not operate a moving motor vehicle while using a wireless communications device unless the holder is using the device to report illegal activity, summon medical or other emergency help, or prevent injury to a person or property.(5) It is a traffic infraction for the holder of an intermediate license to operate a motor vehicle in violation of the restrictions imposed under this section.(6) Except for a violation of subsection (4) of this section, enforcement of this section by law enforcement officers may be accomplished only as a secondary action when a driver of a motor vehicle has been detained for a suspected violation of this title or an equivalent local ordinance or some other offense.(7) An intermediate licensee may drive at any hour without restrictions on the number of passengers in the vehicle if necessary for agricultural purposes.(8) An intermediate licensee may drive at any hour without restrictions on the number of passengers in the vehicle if, for the 12-month period following the issuance of the intermediate license, he or she:(a) Has not been involved in an accident involving only one motor vehicle;(b) Has not been involved in an accident where he or she was cited in connection with the accident or was found to have caused the accident;(c) Has not been involved in an accident where no one was cited or was found to have caused the accident; and(d) Has not been convicted of or found to have committed a traffic offense described in chapter 46.61 RCW or violated restrictions placed on an intermediate licensee under this section.(9) For the purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:(a) "Immediate family" means an individual's spouse or domestic partner, child, stepchild, grandchild, parent, stepparent, grandparent, brother, half-brother, sister, or half-sister of the individual, including foster children living in the household, and the spouse or the domestic partner of any such person, and a child, stepchild, grandchild, parent, stepparent, grandparent, brother, half-brother, sister, or half-sister of the individual's spouse or domestic partner, and the spouse or the domestic partner of any such person.(b) "Responsible adult" means a person specifically authorized by the department who is over the age of 21 and:(i) Has a familial, kinship, or caretaker relationship to a minor;(ii) Is an educational, medical, legal, social service, or Washington state licensed mental health professional who provides support directly to a minor in a professional capacity; or(iii) Is an employee of a government entity and provides support to a minor in a professional capacity.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3. A new section is added to chapter 43.59 RCW to read as follows:The commission is required to contract with a provider of an online driver work zone and first responder safety course to host an online course that satisfies the intermediate driver's license requirement under section 1 of this act to be made available at no cost to Washington residents who are between the ages of 15 and 25.Sec. 4. RCW 46.63.200 and 2024 c 308 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:(1) This section applies to the use of speed safety camera systems in state highway work zones.(2) Nothing in this section prohibits a law enforcement officer from issuing a notice of infraction to a person in control of a vehicle at the time a violation occurs under RCW 46.63.030(1) (a), (b), or (c).(3)(a) The department of transportation is responsible for all actions related to the operation and administration of speed safety camera systems in state highway work zones including, but not limited to, the procurement and administration of contracts necessary for the implementation of speed safety camera systems, the mailing of notices of infraction, and the development and maintenance of a public-facing website for the purpose of educating the traveling public about the use of speed safety camera systems in state highway work zones. Prior to the use of a speed safety camera system to capture a violation established in this section for enforcement purposes, the department of transportation, in consultation with the Washington state patrol, department of licensing, office of administrative hearings, Washington traffic safety commission, and other organizations committed to protecting civil rights, must adopt rules addressing such actions and take all necessary steps to implement this section.(b) The Washington state patrol is responsible for all actions related to the enforcement and adjudication of speed violations under this section including, but not limited to, notice of infraction verification and issuance authorization, and determining which types of emergency vehicles are exempt from being issued notices of infraction under this section. Prior to the use of a speed safety camera system to capture a violation established in this section for enforcement purposes, the Washington state patrol, in consultation with the department of transportation, department of licensing, office of administrative hearings, Washington traffic safety commission, and other organizations committed to protecting civil rights, must adopt rules addressing such actions and take all necessary steps to implement this section.(c) When establishing rules under this subsection (3), the department of transportation and the Washington state patrol may also consult with other public and private agencies that have an interest in the use of speed safety camera systems in state highway work zones.(4)(a) No person may drive a vehicle in a state highway work zone at a speed greater than that allowed by traffic control devices.(b) A notice of infraction may only be issued under this section if a speed safety camera system captures a speed violation in a state highway work zone when workers are present.(5) The penalty for a speed safety camera system violation is: (a) $0 for the first violation; and (b) $248 for the second violation, and for each violation thereafter.(6) During the 30-day period after the first speed safety camera system is put in place, the department is required to conduct a public awareness campaign to inform the public of the use of speed safety camera systems in state highway work zones.(7)(a) A notice of infraction issued under this section may be mailed to the registered owner of the vehicle within 30 days of the violation, or to the renter of a vehicle within 30 days of establishing the renter's name and address. The law enforcement officer issuing the notice of infraction shall include with it a certificate or facsimile thereof, based upon inspection of photographs, microphotographs, or electronic images produced by a speed safety camera stating the facts supporting the notice of infraction. This certificate or facsimile is prima facie evidence of the facts contained in it and is admissible in a proceeding charging a violation under this section. The photographs, microphotographs, or electronic images evidencing the violation must be available for inspection and admission into evidence in a proceeding to adjudicate the liability for the violation. (b) A notice of infraction represents a determination that an infraction has been committed, and the determination will be final unless contested as provided under this section.(c) A person receiving a notice of infraction based on evidence detected by a speed safety camera system must, within 30 days of receiving the notice of infraction: (i) Except for a first violation under subsection (5)(a) of this section, remit payment in the amount of the penalty assessed for the violation; (ii) contest the determination that the infraction occurred by following the instructions on the notice of infraction; or (iii) admit to the infraction but request a hearing to explain mitigating circumstances surrounding the infraction.(d) If a person fails to respond to a notice of infraction, a final order shall be entered finding that the person committed the infraction and assessing monetary penalties required under subsection (5)(b) of this section.(e) If a person contests the determination that the infraction occurred or requests a mitigation hearing, the notice of infraction shall be referred to the office of administrative hearings for adjudication consistent with chapter 34.05 RCW.(f) At a hearing to contest an infraction, the agency issuing the infraction has the burden of proving, by a preponderance of the evidence, that the infraction was committed.(g) A person may request a payment plan at any time for the payment of any penalty or other monetary obligation associated with an infraction under this section. The agency issuing the infraction shall provide information about how to submit evidence of inability to pay, how to obtain a payment plan, and that failure to pay or enter into a payment plan may result in collection action or nonrenewal of the vehicle registration. The office of administrative hearings may authorize a payment plan if it determines that a person is not able to pay the monetary obligation, and it may modify a payment plan at any time.(8)(a) Speed safety camera systems may only take photographs, microphotographs, or electronic images of the vehicle and vehicle license plate and only while a speed violation is occurring. The photograph, microphotograph, or electronic image must not reveal the face of the driver or any passengers in the vehicle. The department of transportation shall consider installing speed safety camera systems in a manner that minimizes the impact of camera flash on drivers.(b) The registered owner of a vehicle is responsible for a traffic infraction under RCW 46.63.030 unless the registered owner overcomes the presumption in RCW 46.63.075 or, in the case of a rental car business, satisfies the conditions under (f) of this subsection. If appropriate under the circumstances, a renter identified under (f)(i) of this subsection is responsible for the traffic infraction.(c) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, all photographs, microphotographs, or electronic images, or any other personally identifying data prepared under this section are for the exclusive use of the Washington state patrol and department of transportation in the discharge of duties under this section and are not open to the public and may not be used in court in a pending action or proceeding unless the action or proceeding relates to a speed violation under this section. This data may be used in administrative appeal proceedings relative to a violation under this section.(d) All locations where speed safety camera systems are used must be clearly marked before activation of the camera system by placing signs in locations that clearly indicate to a driver that they are entering a state highway work zone where posted speed limits are monitored by a speed safety camera system. Additionally, where feasible and constructive, radar speed feedback signs will be placed in advance of the speed safety camera system to assist drivers in complying with posted speed limits. Signs placed in these locations must follow the specifications and guidelines under the manual of uniform traffic control devices for streets and highways as adopted by the department of transportation under chapter 47.36 RCW.(e) Imposition of a penalty for a speed violation detected through the use of speed safety camera systems shall not be deemed a conviction as defined in RCW 46.25.010, and shall not be part of the registered owner's driving record under RCWÂ  46.52.101 and 46.52.120. Additionally, infractions generated by the use of speed safety camera systems under this section shall be processed in the same manner as parking infractions, including for the purposes of RCW 46.16A.120 and 46.20.270(2).(f) If the registered owner of the vehicle is a rental car business, the department of transportation shall, before a notice of infraction may be issued under this section, provide a written notice to the rental car business that a notice of infraction may be issued to the rental car business if the rental car business does not, within 30 days of receiving the written notice, provide to the issuing agency by return mail:(i)(A) A statement under oath stating the name and known mailing address of the individual driving or renting the vehicle when the speed violation occurred;(B) A statement under oath that the business is unable to determine who was driving or renting the vehicle at the time the speed violation occurred because the vehicle was stolen at the time of the violation. A statement provided under this subsection (8)(f)(i)(B) must be accompanied by a copy of a filed police report regarding the vehicle theft; or(C) In lieu of identifying the vehicle operator, payment of the applicable penalty.(ii) Timely mailing of a statement to the department of transportation relieves a rental car business of any liability under this chapter for the notice of infraction.(9) Revenue generated from the deployment of speed safety camera systems must be deposited into the highway safety fund and first used exclusively for the operating and administrative costs under this section. The operation of speed safety camera systems is intended to increase safety in state highway work zones by changing driver behavior. Consequently, any revenue generated that exceeds the operating and administrative costs under this section must be distributed for the purpose of traffic safety including, but not limited to, driver training education, including to fund the online work zone and first responder safety course required under section 1 of this act, and local DUI emphasis patrols.(10) The Washington state patrol and department of transportation, in collaboration with the Washington traffic safety commission, must report to the transportation committees of the legislature by July 1, 2025, and biennially thereafter, on the data and efficacy of speed safety camera system use in state highway work zones. The final report due on July 1, 2029, must include a recommendation on whether or not to continue such speed safety camera system use beyond June 30, 2030.(11) For the purposes of this section:(a) "Speed safety camera system" means employing the use of speed measuring devices and cameras synchronized to automatically record one or more sequenced photographs, microphotographs, or other electronic images of a motor vehicle that exceeds a posted state highway work zone speed limit as detected by the speed measuring devices.(b) "State highway work zone" means an area of any highway with construction, maintenance, utility work, or incident response activities authorized by the department of transportation. A state highway work zone is identified by the placement of temporary traffic control devices that may include signs, channelizing devices, barriers, pavement markings, and/or work vehicles with warning lights. It extends from the first warning sign or high intensity rotating, flashing, oscillating, or strobe lights on a vehicle to the end road work sign or the last temporary traffic control device or vehicle.(12) This section expires June 30, 2030.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 5. This act takes effect January 1, 2026.--- END ---